Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1301
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-1301 to 9-1313 shall be known and may be cited as the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 33.